Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2906
Letters of interest; requirements.

(1) A political subdivision shall prepare a request for letters of interest for design-build proposals and shall prequalify design-builders in accordance with this section. The request for letters of interest shall describe the project in sufficient detail to permit a design-builder to submit a letter of interest.

(2) The request for letters of interest shall be (a) published in a newspaper of general circulation within the political subdivision at least thirty days prior to the deadline for receiving letters of interest and (b) sent by first-class mail to any design-builder upon request.

(3) Letters of interest shall be reviewed by the political subdivision in consultation with the performance-criteria developer. The political subdivision shall select prospective design-builders in accordance with the procedures and standards adopted by the political subdivision pursuant to section 13-2905. The political subdivision shall select at least three prospective design-builders, except that if only two design-builders have submitted letters of interest, the political subdivision shall select at least two prospective design-builders. The selected design-builders shall then be considered prequalified and eligible to receive requests for proposals.

Laws 2002, LB 391, § 6; R.S.1943, (2003), § 79-2006;

Laws 2008, LB889, § 6.